Utah statutes.
63M-1-1604.   Duties.

(1)  The Office of Rural Development shall:

(a)  provide, in conjunction with the Rural Coordinating Committee, staff support to the Governor's Rural Partnership Board;

(b)  facilitate within the Governor's Office of Economic Development implementation of the strategic plan prepared under Subsection 63C-10-103(2);

(c)  work to enhance the capacity of the Governor's Office of Economic Development to address rural economic development, planning, and leadership training challenges and opportunities by establishing partnerships and positive working relationships with appropriate public and private sector entities, individuals, and institutions;

(d)  work with the Rural Coordinating Committee to coordinate and focus available resources in ways that address the economic development, planning, and leadership training challenges and priorities in rural Utah; and

(e)  in accordance with economic development and planning policies set by state government, coordinate relations between:

(i)  the state;

(ii)  rural governments;

(iii)  other public and private groups engaged in rural economic planning and development; and

(iv)  federal agencies.

(2) (a)  The Office of Rural Development may:

(i)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules necessary to carry out its duties;

(ii)  accept gifts, grants, devises, and property, in cash or in kind, for the benefit of rural Utah citizens; and

(iii)  use those gifts, grants, devises, and property received under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) for the use and benefit of rural citizens within the state.

(b)  All resources received under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) shall be deposited in the General Fund as dedicated credits to be used as directed in Subsection (2)(a)(iii).



Amended by Chapter 391, 2010 General Session

